Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5302XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5302XD (2) 91
sc/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 97B.17, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
1. The system shall establish and maintain records of
each member, including but not limited to the amount of wages
of each member, the contributions made on behalf of each
member with interest, interest dividends credited, beneficiary
designations, and applications for benefits of any type. The
records may be maintained in paper, magnetic, or electronic
form, including optical disk storage, as set forth in chapter
554D. The system may accept, but shall not require, electronic
records and electronic signatures to the extent permitted under
chapter 554D. These records are the basis for the compilation
of the retirement benefits provided under this chapter.
Sec. 2. Section 97B.17, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 6. The system may release the legal name of
a member or beneficiary to the treasurer of state for purposes
of assisting the system in locating the member or beneficiary.
Sec. 3. Section 97B.18, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
97B.18 Statement of accumulated credit.
After the expiration of each calendar year and prior to July
1 of the succeeding year, the system shall furnish each member
with a statement of the member’s accumulated contributions and
benefit credits accrued under this chapter up to the end of
that calendar year over the prior four quarters and additional
information the system deems useful to a member. The system
may furnish an estimate of the credits as of the projected
normal retirement date of the member under section 97B.45. The
records of the system as shown by the statement as to the wages
of each individual member for a year and the periods of payment
shall be conclusive for the purpose of this chapter, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter.
Sec. 4. Section 97B.48, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
LSB 5302XD (2) 91
-1- sc/ns 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
6. Effective July 1, 2005, monthly Monthly retirement
allowance payments shall be directly deposited without charge
to a retired member’s account via electronic funds transfer.
A In lieu of electronic funds transfers, a retired member
may elect to receive monthly allowance payments in the form
of a reloadable payment card for which the system shall not
charge an administrative fee, or as paper warrants in lieu
of electronic funds transfers, but for which the system
shall charge an administrative fee for processing such paper
warrants. However, the system may, for good cause shown, waive
the administrative fee. The fee may be automatically deducted
from the monthly retirement allowance before the warrant is
issued to the retired member.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate
importance, takes effect upon enactment.